Maine, session 132, LD1382.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §1130, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Loan requests. A municipality or quasi-municipal corporation or district may
request a loan pursuant to subsection 2 of up to $1,000,000 per application with a payback
period between 5 and 30 years, but in no case may the payback period be longer than the
useful life of the proposed project. The department may require a municipality or quasi-
municipal corporation or district to provide matching funds in order to be considered for a
loan under this section. The department may establish a loan forgiveness program for loans
granted under this section.